src/fst/emojis.lexc
LEXICON emojis


⌚	emoji-inflections	;
⌛	emoji-inflections	;
⏩	emoji-inflections	;
⏬	emoji-inflections	;
⏰	emoji-inflections	;
⏳	emoji-inflections	;
◽	emoji-inflections	;
◾	emoji-inflections	;
☔	emoji-inflections	;
☕	emoji-inflections	;
♈	emoji-inflections	;
♓	emoji-inflections	;
♿	emoji-inflections	;
⚓	emoji-inflections	;
⚡	emoji-inflections	;
⚪	emoji-inflections	;
⚫	emoji-inflections	;
⚽	emoji-inflections	;
⚾	emoji-inflections	;
⛄	emoji-inflections	;
⛅	emoji-inflections	;
⛎	emoji-inflections	;
⛔	emoji-inflections	;
⛪	emoji-inflections	;
⛲	emoji-inflections	;
⛳	emoji-inflections	;
⛵	emoji-inflections	;
⛺	emoji-inflections	;
⛽	emoji-inflections	;
✅	emoji-inflections	;
✊	emoji-inflections	;
✋	emoji-inflections	;
✨	emoji-inflections	;
❌	emoji-inflections	;
❎	emoji-inflections	;
❓	emoji-inflections	;
❕	emoji-inflections	;
❗	emoji-inflections	;
➕	emoji-inflections	;
➗	emoji-inflections	;
➰	emoji-inflections	;
➿	emoji-inflections	;
⬛	emoji-inflections	;
⬜	emoji-inflections	;
⭐	emoji-inflections	;
⭕	emoji-inflections	;
🀄	emoji-inflections	;
🃏	emoji-inflections	;
🆎	emoji-inflections	;
🆑	emoji-inflections	;
🆚	emoji-inflections	;
🈁	emoji-inflections	;
🈚	emoji-inflections	;
🈯	emoji-inflections	;
🈲	emoji-inflections	;
🈶	emoji-inflections	;
🈸	emoji-inflections	;
🈺	emoji-inflections	;
🉐	emoji-inflections	;
🉑	emoji-inflections	;
🌀	emoji-inflections	;
🌌	emoji-inflections	;
🌍	emoji-inflections	;
🌎	emoji-inflections	;
🌏	emoji-inflections	;
🌐	emoji-inflections	;
🌑	emoji-inflections	;
🌒	emoji-inflections	;
🌓	emoji-inflections	;
🌕	emoji-inflections	;
🌖	emoji-inflections	;
🌘	emoji-inflections	;
🌙	emoji-inflections	;
🌚	emoji-inflections	;
🌛	emoji-inflections	;
🌜	emoji-inflections	;
🌝	emoji-inflections	;
🌞	emoji-inflections	;
🌟	emoji-inflections	;
🌠	emoji-inflections	;
🌭	emoji-inflections	;
🌯	emoji-inflections	;
🌰	emoji-inflections	;
🌱	emoji-inflections	;
🌲	emoji-inflections	;
🌳	emoji-inflections	;
🌴	emoji-inflections	;
🌵	emoji-inflections	;
🌷	emoji-inflections	;
🍊	emoji-inflections	;
🍋	emoji-inflections	;
🍌	emoji-inflections	;
🍏	emoji-inflections	;
🍐	emoji-inflections	;
🍑	emoji-inflections	;
🍻	emoji-inflections	;
🍼	emoji-inflections	;
🍾	emoji-inflections	;
🍿	emoji-inflections	;
🎀	emoji-inflections	;
🎓	emoji-inflections	;
🎠	emoji-inflections	;
🏄	emoji-inflections	;
🏅	emoji-inflections	;
🏆	emoji-inflections	;
🏇	emoji-inflections	;
🏈	emoji-inflections	;
🏉	emoji-inflections	;
🏊	emoji-inflections	;
🏏	emoji-inflections	;
🏓	emoji-inflections	;
🏠	emoji-inflections	;
🏣	emoji-inflections	;
🏤	emoji-inflections	;
🏥	emoji-inflections	;
🏰	emoji-inflections	;
🏴	emoji-inflections	;
🏸	emoji-inflections	;
🐇	emoji-inflections	;
🐈	emoji-inflections	;
🐉	emoji-inflections	;
🐋	emoji-inflections	;
🐌	emoji-inflections	;
🐎	emoji-inflections	;
🐏	emoji-inflections	;
🐐	emoji-inflections	;
🐑	emoji-inflections	;
🐒	emoji-inflections	;
🐓	emoji-inflections	;
🐔	emoji-inflections	;
🐕	emoji-inflections	;
🐖	emoji-inflections	;
🐗	emoji-inflections	;
🐩	emoji-inflections	;
🐪	emoji-inflections	;
🐫	emoji-inflections	;
🐾	emoji-inflections	;
👀	emoji-inflections	;
👂	emoji-inflections	;
👤	emoji-inflections	;
👥	emoji-inflections	;
👦	emoji-inflections	;
👫	emoji-inflections	;
👬	emoji-inflections	;
👭	emoji-inflections	;
👮	emoji-inflections	;
💬	emoji-inflections	;
💭	emoji-inflections	;
💮	emoji-inflections	;
💵	emoji-inflections	;
💶	emoji-inflections	;
💷	emoji-inflections	;
💸	emoji-inflections	;
📫	emoji-inflections	;
📬	emoji-inflections	;
📭	emoji-inflections	;
📮	emoji-inflections	;
📯	emoji-inflections	;
📰	emoji-inflections	;
📴	emoji-inflections	;
📵	emoji-inflections	;
📶	emoji-inflections	;
📷	emoji-inflections	;
📸	emoji-inflections	;
📹	emoji-inflections	;
📼	emoji-inflections	;
📿	emoji-inflections	;
🔂	emoji-inflections	;
🔃	emoji-inflections	;
🔄	emoji-inflections	;
🔇	emoji-inflections	;
🔈	emoji-inflections	;
🔉	emoji-inflections	;
🔊	emoji-inflections	;
🔔	emoji-inflections	;
🔕	emoji-inflections	;
🔖	emoji-inflections	;
🔫	emoji-inflections	;
🔬	emoji-inflections	;
🔭	emoji-inflections	;
🔮	emoji-inflections	;
🔽	emoji-inflections	;
🕋	emoji-inflections	;
🕎	emoji-inflections	;
🕐	emoji-inflections	;
🕛	emoji-inflections	;
🕜	emoji-inflections	;
🕧	emoji-inflections	;
🕺	emoji-inflections	;
🖕	emoji-inflections	;
🖖	emoji-inflections	;
🖤	emoji-inflections	;
🗻	emoji-inflections	;
🗿	emoji-inflections	;
😀	emoji-inflections	;
😁	emoji-inflections	;
😆	emoji-inflections	;
😇	emoji-inflections	;
😈	emoji-inflections	;
😉	emoji-inflections	;
😍	emoji-inflections	;
😎	emoji-inflections	;
😏	emoji-inflections	;
😐	emoji-inflections	;
😑	emoji-inflections	;
😒	emoji-inflections	;
😔	emoji-inflections	;
😕	emoji-inflections	;
😖	emoji-inflections	;
😗	emoji-inflections	;
😘	emoji-inflections	;
😙	emoji-inflections	;
😚	emoji-inflections	;
😛	emoji-inflections	;
😜	emoji-inflections	;
😞	emoji-inflections	;
😟	emoji-inflections	;
😠	emoji-inflections	;
😥	emoji-inflections	;
😦	emoji-inflections	;
😧	emoji-inflections	;
😨	emoji-inflections	;
😫	emoji-inflections	;
😬	emoji-inflections	;
😭	emoji-inflections	;
😮	emoji-inflections	;
😯	emoji-inflections	;
😰	emoji-inflections	;
😳	emoji-inflections	;
😴	emoji-inflections	;
😵	emoji-inflections	;
😶	emoji-inflections	;
😷	emoji-inflections	;
🙀	emoji-inflections	;
🙁	emoji-inflections	;
🙄	emoji-inflections	;
🙅	emoji-inflections	;
🙏	emoji-inflections	;
🚀	emoji-inflections	;
🚁	emoji-inflections	;
🚂	emoji-inflections	;
🚃	emoji-inflections	;
🚅	emoji-inflections	;
🚆	emoji-inflections	;
🚇	emoji-inflections	;
🚈	emoji-inflections	;
🚉	emoji-inflections	;
🚊	emoji-inflections	;
🚋	emoji-inflections	;
🚌	emoji-inflections	;
🚍	emoji-inflections	;
🚎	emoji-inflections	;
🚏	emoji-inflections	;
🚐	emoji-inflections	;
🚑	emoji-inflections	;
🚓	emoji-inflections	;
🚔	emoji-inflections	;
🚕	emoji-inflections	;
🚖	emoji-inflections	;
🚗	emoji-inflections	;
🚘	emoji-inflections	;
🚙	emoji-inflections	;
🚚	emoji-inflections	;
🚛	emoji-inflections	;
🚡	emoji-inflections	;
🚢	emoji-inflections	;
🚣	emoji-inflections	;
🚤	emoji-inflections	;
🚥	emoji-inflections	;
🚦	emoji-inflections	;
🚧	emoji-inflections	;
🚭	emoji-inflections	;
🚮	emoji-inflections	;
🚱	emoji-inflections	;
🚲	emoji-inflections	;
🚳	emoji-inflections	;
🚵	emoji-inflections	;
🚶	emoji-inflections	;
🚷	emoji-inflections	;
🚸	emoji-inflections	;
🚹	emoji-inflections	;
🚾	emoji-inflections	;
🚿	emoji-inflections	;
🛀	emoji-inflections	;
🛁	emoji-inflections	;
🛅	emoji-inflections	;
🛌	emoji-inflections	;
🛐	emoji-inflections	;
🛑	emoji-inflections	;
🛒	emoji-inflections	;
🛕	emoji-inflections	;
🛖	emoji-inflections	;
🛗	emoji-inflections	;
🛜	emoji-inflections	;
🛝	emoji-inflections	;
🛟	emoji-inflections	;
🛫	emoji-inflections	;
🛬	emoji-inflections	;
🛴	emoji-inflections	;
🛶	emoji-inflections	;
🛷	emoji-inflections	;
🛸	emoji-inflections	;
🛹	emoji-inflections	;
🛺	emoji-inflections	;
🛻	emoji-inflections	;
🛼	emoji-inflections	;
🟠	emoji-inflections	;
🟫	emoji-inflections	;
🟰	emoji-inflections	;
🤌	emoji-inflections	;
🤍	emoji-inflections	;
🤏	emoji-inflections	;
🤐	emoji-inflections	;
🤘	emoji-inflections	;
🤙	emoji-inflections	;
🤞	emoji-inflections	;
🤟	emoji-inflections	;
🤠	emoji-inflections	;
🤧	emoji-inflections	;
🤨	emoji-inflections	;
🤯	emoji-inflections	;
🤰	emoji-inflections	;
🤱	emoji-inflections	;
🤲	emoji-inflections	;
🤳	emoji-inflections	;
🤺	emoji-inflections	;
🤼	emoji-inflections	;
🤾	emoji-inflections	;
🤿	emoji-inflections	;
🥀	emoji-inflections	;
🥅	emoji-inflections	;
🥇	emoji-inflections	;
🥋	emoji-inflections	;
🥌	emoji-inflections	;
🥍	emoji-inflections	;
🥏	emoji-inflections	;
🥐	emoji-inflections	;
🥞	emoji-inflections	;
🥟	emoji-inflections	;
🥫	emoji-inflections	;
🥬	emoji-inflections	;
🥰	emoji-inflections	;
🥱	emoji-inflections	;
🥲	emoji-inflections	;
🥳	emoji-inflections	;
🥶	emoji-inflections	;
🥷	emoji-inflections	;
🥸	emoji-inflections	;
🥹	emoji-inflections	;
🥺	emoji-inflections	;
🥻	emoji-inflections	;
🥼	emoji-inflections	;
🥿	emoji-inflections	;
🦀	emoji-inflections	;
🦄	emoji-inflections	;
🦅	emoji-inflections	;
🦑	emoji-inflections	;
🦒	emoji-inflections	;
🦗	emoji-inflections	;
🦘	emoji-inflections	;
🦢	emoji-inflections	;
🦣	emoji-inflections	;
🦤	emoji-inflections	;
🦥	emoji-inflections	;
🦪	emoji-inflections	;
🦫	emoji-inflections	;
🦭	emoji-inflections	;
🦮	emoji-inflections	;
🦯	emoji-inflections	;
🦰	emoji-inflections	;
🦹	emoji-inflections	;
🦺	emoji-inflections	;
🦿	emoji-inflections	;
🧀	emoji-inflections	;
🧁	emoji-inflections	;
🧂	emoji-inflections	;
🧃	emoji-inflections	;
🧊	emoji-inflections	;
🧋	emoji-inflections	;
🧌	emoji-inflections	;
🧍	emoji-inflections	;
🧏	emoji-inflections	;
🧐	emoji-inflections	;
🧦	emoji-inflections	;
🧧	emoji-inflections	;
🧿	emoji-inflections	;
🩰	emoji-inflections	;
🩳	emoji-inflections	;
🩴	emoji-inflections	;
🩵	emoji-inflections	;
🩷	emoji-inflections	;
🩸	emoji-inflections	;
🩺	emoji-inflections	;
🩻	emoji-inflections	;
🩼	emoji-inflections	;
🪀	emoji-inflections	;
🪂	emoji-inflections	;
🪃	emoji-inflections	;
🪆	emoji-inflections	;
🪇	emoji-inflections	;
🪈	emoji-inflections	;
🪉	emoji-inflections	;
🪏	emoji-inflections	;
🪐	emoji-inflections	;
🪕	emoji-inflections	;
🪖	emoji-inflections	;
🪨	emoji-inflections	;
🪩	emoji-inflections	;
🪬	emoji-inflections	;
🪭	emoji-inflections	;
🪯	emoji-inflections	;
🪰	emoji-inflections	;
🪶	emoji-inflections	;
🪷	emoji-inflections	;
🪺	emoji-inflections	;
🪻	emoji-inflections	;
🪽	emoji-inflections	;
🪾	emoji-inflections	;
🪿	emoji-inflections	;
🫀	emoji-inflections	;
🫂	emoji-inflections	;
🫃	emoji-inflections	;
🫅	emoji-inflections	;
🫆	emoji-inflections	;
🫎	emoji-inflections	;
🫏	emoji-inflections	;
🫐	emoji-inflections	;
🫖	emoji-inflections	;
🫗	emoji-inflections	;
🫙	emoji-inflections	;
🫚	emoji-inflections	;
🫛	emoji-inflections	;
🫜	emoji-inflections	;
🫟	emoji-inflections	;
🫠	emoji-inflections	;
🫧	emoji-inflections	;
🫨	emoji-inflections	;
🫩	emoji-inflections	;
🫰	emoji-inflections	;
🫶	emoji-inflections	;
🫷	emoji-inflections	;
🫸	emoji-inflections	;
©️	emoji-inflections	;
®️	emoji-inflections	;
‼️	emoji-inflections	;
⁉️	emoji-inflections	;
™️	emoji-inflections	;
ℹ️	emoji-inflections	;
↔️	emoji-inflections	;
↕️	emoji-inflections	;
↖️	emoji-inflections	;
↗️	emoji-inflections	;
↘️	emoji-inflections	;
↙️	emoji-inflections	;
↩️	emoji-inflections	;
↪️	emoji-inflections	;
⌨️	emoji-inflections	;
⏏️	emoji-inflections	;
⏭️	emoji-inflections	;
⏮️	emoji-inflections	;
⏯️	emoji-inflections	;
⏱️	emoji-inflections	;
⏲️	emoji-inflections	;
⏸️	emoji-inflections	;
⏹️	emoji-inflections	;
⏺️	emoji-inflections	;
Ⓜ️	emoji-inflections	;
▪️	emoji-inflections	;
▫️	emoji-inflections	;
▶️	emoji-inflections	;
◀️	emoji-inflections	;
◻️	emoji-inflections	;
◼️	emoji-inflections	;
☀️	emoji-inflections	;
☁️	emoji-inflections	;
☂️	emoji-inflections	;
☃️	emoji-inflections	;
☄️	emoji-inflections	;
☎️	emoji-inflections	;
☑️	emoji-inflections	;
☘️	emoji-inflections	;
☝️	emoji-inflections	;
☠️	emoji-inflections	;
☢️	emoji-inflections	;
☣️	emoji-inflections	;
☦️	emoji-inflections	;
☪️	emoji-inflections	;
☮️	emoji-inflections	;
☯️	emoji-inflections	;
☸️	emoji-inflections	;
☹️	emoji-inflections	;
☺️	emoji-inflections	;
♀️	emoji-inflections	;
♂️	emoji-inflections	;
♟️	emoji-inflections	;
♠️	emoji-inflections	;
♣️	emoji-inflections	;
♥️	emoji-inflections	;
♦️	emoji-inflections	;
♨️	emoji-inflections	;
♻️	emoji-inflections	;
♾️	emoji-inflections	;
⚒️	emoji-inflections	;
⚔️	emoji-inflections	;
⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
⚖️	emoji-inflections	;
⚗️	emoji-inflections	;
⚙️	emoji-inflections	;
⚛️	emoji-inflections	;
⚜️	emoji-inflections	;
⚠️	emoji-inflections	;
⚧️	emoji-inflections	;
⚰️	emoji-inflections	;
⚱️	emoji-inflections	;
⛈️	emoji-inflections	;
⛏️	emoji-inflections	;
⛑️	emoji-inflections	;
⛓️	emoji-inflections	;
⛩️	emoji-inflections	;
⛰️	emoji-inflections	;
⛱️	emoji-inflections	;
⛴️	emoji-inflections	;
⛷️	emoji-inflections	;
⛸️	emoji-inflections	;
⛹️	emoji-inflections	;
✂️	emoji-inflections	;
✈️	emoji-inflections	;
✉️	emoji-inflections	;
✌️	emoji-inflections	;
✍️	emoji-inflections	;
✏️	emoji-inflections	;
✒️	emoji-inflections	;
✔️	emoji-inflections	;
✖️	emoji-inflections	;
✝️	emoji-inflections	;
✡️	emoji-inflections	;
✳️	emoji-inflections	;
✴️	emoji-inflections	;
❄️	emoji-inflections	;
❇️	emoji-inflections	;
